Massachusetts, session 194th, H1219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 57A of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 21, the figure $1,000 and inserting in
place thereof the following figure: – $5,000.
SECTION 2. Section 113B of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “accidents”, in line 201, the
following words:- resulting in a claim payment of more than $5,000, in excess of any applicable
deductible.
SECTION 3. Said section 113B of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “section”, in line 334, the following words:- ; provided
of 2

however, that for purposes of establishing and fixing premium charges, an at-fault accident shall
not be a surchargeable incident if the resulting claim payment is equal to or less than $5,000, in
excess of any applicable deductible.
SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 113B½ and inserting in place thereof the
following section:-
Section 113B½. For an at-fault accident claim, a minor accident shall be an accident for
which the claim payment, exclusive of any deductible, exceeds $5,000 but is not more than
$7,500 under: (i) property damage liability coverage; (ii) collision coverage; (iii) limited
collision coverage; (iv) for accidents occurring on or after January 1, 2006, bodily injury liability
coverage if there is neither a surchargeable property damage liability coverage claim nor a
surchargeable collision coverage claim; or (v) as a result of an accident with a bodily injury
liability coverage claim. For an at-fault accident claim, a major accident shall be an accident for
which the claim payment, exclusive of any deductible, exceeds $7,500 under: (A) property
damage liability coverage; (B) collision coverage; (C) limited collision coverage; (D) for
accidents occurring on or after January 1, 2006, bodily injury liability coverage if there is neither
a surchargeable property damage liability coverage claim nor a surchargeable collision coverage
claim; or (E) as a result of an accident with a bodily injury liability coverage claim. No motor
vehicle liability policy, as defined by section 34A of chapter 90, shall apply an increase in
premium as a result of an at-fault accident that does not satisfy the criteria for a minor or major
accident. For purposes of this section, “premium” shall mean the cost of a policy, or coverage
within a policy, to an individual policyholder based on the particular drivers and motor vehicles
insured under the policy.
of 2